Illinois, session 104th, HB1854.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-501 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-501)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-501)7    Sec. 11-501. Driving while under the influence of alcohol, 8other drug or drugs, intoxicating compound or compounds or any 9combination thereof. 10    (a) A person shall not drive or be in actual physical 11control of any vehicle within this State while:12        (1) the alcohol concentration in the person's blood, 13    other bodily substance, or breath is 0.08 or more based on 14    the definition of blood and breath units in Section 15    11-501.2;16        (2) under the influence of alcohol;17        (3) under the influence of any intoxicating compound 18    or combination of intoxicating compounds to a degree that 19    renders the person incapable of driving safely;20        (4) under the influence of any other drug or 21    combination of drugs to a degree that renders the person 22    incapable of safely driving;23        (5) under the combined influence of alcohol, other   HB1854- 2 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds to a 2    degree that renders the person incapable of safely 3    driving;4        (6) there is any amount of a drug, substance, or 5    compound in the person's breath, blood, other bodily 6    substance, or urine resulting from the unlawful use or 7    consumption of a controlled substance listed in the 8    Illinois Controlled Substances Act, an intoxicating 9    compound listed in the Use of Intoxicating Compounds Act, 10    or methamphetamine as listed in the Methamphetamine 11    Control and Community Protection Act; or12        (7) the person has, within 2 hours of driving or being 13    in actual physical control of a vehicle, a 14    tetrahydrocannabinol concentration in the person's whole 15    blood or other bodily substance as defined in paragraph 6 16    of subsection (a) of Section 11-501.2 of this Code. 17    Subject to all other requirements and provisions under 18    this Section, this paragraph (7) does not apply to the 19    lawful consumption of cannabis by a qualifying patient 20    licensed under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21    Program Act who is in possession of a valid registry card 22    issued under that Act, unless that person is impaired by 23    the use of cannabis.24    (b) The fact that any person charged with violating this 25Section is or has been legally entitled to use alcohol, 26cannabis under the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis   HB1854- 3 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1Program Act, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 2compounds, or any combination thereof, shall not constitute a 3defense against any charge of violating this Section.4    (c) Penalties.5        (1) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, any 6    person convicted of violating subsection (a) of this 7    Section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.8        (2) A person who violates subsection (a) or a similar 9    provision a second time shall be sentenced to a mandatory 10    minimum term of either 5 days of imprisonment or 240 hours 11    of community service in addition to any other criminal or 12    administrative sanction.13        (3) A person who violates subsection (a) is subject to 14    6 months of imprisonment, an additional mandatory minimum 15    fine of $1,000, and 25 days of community service in a 16    program benefiting children if the person was transporting 17    a person under the age of 16 at the time of the violation.18        (4) A person who violates subsection (a) a first time, 19    if the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, breath, 20    other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on 21    the definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, 22    or urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 23    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 24    mandatory minimum of 100 hours of community service and a 25    mandatory minimum fine of $500.26        (5) A person who violates subsection (a) a second   HB1854- 4 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    time, if at the time of the second violation the alcohol 2    concentration in his or her blood, breath, other bodily 3    substance, or urine was 0.16 or more based on the 4    definition of blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 5    urine units in Section 11-501.2, shall be subject, in 6    addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, to a 7    mandatory minimum of 2 days of imprisonment and a 8    mandatory minimum fine of $1,250.9    (d) Aggravated driving under the influence of alcohol, 10other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or compounds, or 11any combination thereof. 12        (1) Every person convicted of committing a violation 13    of this Section shall be guilty of aggravated driving 14    under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 15    intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination 16    thereof if:17            (A) the person committed a violation of subsection 18        (a) or a similar provision for the third or subsequent 19        time;20            (B) the person committed a violation of subsection 21        (a) while driving a school bus with one or more 22        passengers on board;23            (C) the person in committing a violation of 24        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 25        that resulted in great bodily harm or permanent 26        disability or disfigurement to another, when the   HB1854- 5 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1        violation was a proximate cause of the injuries;2            (D) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) and has been previously convicted of violating 4        Section 9-3 of the Criminal Code of 1961 or the 5        Criminal Code of 2012 or a similar provision of a law 6        of another state relating to reckless homicide in 7        which the person was determined to have been under the 8        influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 9        intoxicating compound or compounds as an element of 10        the offense or the person has previously been 11        convicted under subparagraph (C) or subparagraph (F) 12        of this paragraph (1);13            (E) the person, in committing a violation of 14        subsection (a) while driving at any speed in a school 15        speed zone at a time when a speed limit of 20 miles per 16        hour was in effect under subsection (a) of Section 17        11-605 of this Code, was involved in a motor vehicle 18        crash that resulted in bodily harm, other than great 19        bodily harm or permanent disability or disfigurement, 20        to another person, when the violation of subsection 21        (a) was a proximate cause of the bodily harm;22            (F) the person, in committing a violation of 23        subsection (a), was involved in a motor vehicle crash 24        or snowmobile, all-terrain vehicle, or watercraft 25        accident that resulted in the death of another person, 26        when the violation of subsection (a) was a proximate   HB1854- 6 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1        cause of the death;2            (G) the person committed a violation of subsection 3        (a) during a period in which the defendant's driving 4        privileges are revoked or suspended, where the 5        revocation or suspension was for a violation of 6        subsection (a) or a similar provision, Section 7        11-501.1, paragraph (b) of Section 11-401, or for 8        reckless homicide as defined in Section 9-3 of the 9        Criminal Code of 1961 or the Criminal Code of 2012;10            (H) the person committed the violation while he or 11        she did not possess a driver's license or permit or a 12        restricted driving permit or a judicial driving permit 13        or a monitoring device driving permit;14            (I) the person committed the violation while he or 15        she knew or should have known that the vehicle he or 16        she was driving was not covered by a liability 17        insurance policy;18            (J) the person in committing a violation of 19        subsection (a) was involved in a motor vehicle crash 20        that resulted in bodily harm, but not great bodily 21        harm, to the child under the age of 16 being 22        transported by the person, if the violation was the 23        proximate cause of the injury; 24            (K) the person in committing a second violation of 25        subsection (a) or a similar provision was transporting 26        a person under the age of 16; or  HB1854- 7 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1            (L) the person committed a violation of subsection 2        (a) of this Section while transporting one or more 3        passengers in a vehicle for-hire. 4        (2)(A) Except as provided otherwise, a person 5    convicted of aggravated driving under the influence of 6    alcohol, other drug or drugs, or intoxicating compound or 7    compounds, or any combination thereof is guilty of a Class 8    4 felony.9        (B) A third violation of this Section or a similar 10    provision is a Class 2 felony. If at the time of the third 11    violation the alcohol concentration in his or her blood, 12    breath, other bodily substance, or urine was 0.16 or more 13    based on the definition of blood, breath, other bodily 14    substance, or urine units in Section 11-501.2, a mandatory 15    minimum of 90 days of imprisonment and a mandatory minimum 16    fine of $2,500 shall be imposed in addition to any other 17    criminal or administrative sanction. If at the time of the 18    third violation, the defendant was transporting a person 19    under the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 20    days of community service in a program benefiting children 21    shall be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 22    administrative sanction.23        (C) A fourth violation of this Section or a similar 24    provision is a Class 2 felony, for which a sentence of 25    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 26    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in   HB1854- 8 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 2    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 3    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 4    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 5    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 6    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fourth 7    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 8    the age of 16 a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of 9    community service in a program benefiting children shall 10    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 11    administrative sanction.12        (D) A fifth violation of this Section or a similar 13    provision is a Class 1 felony, for which a sentence of 14    probation or conditional discharge may not be imposed. If 15    at the time of the violation, the alcohol concentration in 16    the defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 17    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 18    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 19    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 20    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 21    administrative sanction. If at the time of the fifth 22    violation, the defendant was transporting a person under 23    the age of 16, a mandatory fine of $25,000, and 25 days of 24    community service in a program benefiting children shall 25    be imposed in addition to any other criminal or 26    administrative sanction.  HB1854- 9 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1        (E) A sixth or subsequent violation of this Section or 2    similar provision is a Class X felony. If at the time of 3    the violation, the alcohol concentration in the 4    defendant's blood, breath, other bodily substance, or 5    urine was 0.16 or more based on the definition of blood, 6    breath, other bodily substance, or urine units in Section 7    11-501.2, a mandatory minimum fine of $5,000 shall be 8    imposed in addition to any other criminal or 9    administrative sanction. If at the time of the violation, 10    the defendant was transporting a person under the age of 11    16, a mandatory fine of $25,000 and 25 days of community 12    service in a program benefiting children shall be imposed 13    in addition to any other criminal or administrative 14    sanction.15        (F) For a violation of subparagraph (C) of paragraph 16    (1) of this subsection (d), the defendant, if sentenced to 17    a term of imprisonment, shall be sentenced to not less 18    than one year nor more than 12 years.19        (G) A violation of subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 20    of this subsection (d) is a Class 2 felony, for which the 21    defendant, unless the court determines that extraordinary 22    circumstances exist and require probation, shall be 23    sentenced to: (i) a term of imprisonment of not less than 3 24    years and not more than 14 years if the violation resulted 25    in the death of one person; or (ii) a term of imprisonment 26    of not less than 6 years and not more than 28 years if the   HB1854- 10 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    violation resulted in the deaths of 2 or more persons. A 2    defendant who violates subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) 3    of this subsection (d) shall also be responsible to make 4    child support payments under Section 520 of the Illinois 5    Marriage and Dissolution of Marriage Act for any child of 6    any person whose death was a result of the violation. 7        (H) For a violation of subparagraph (J) of paragraph 8    (1) of this subsection (d), a mandatory fine of $2,500, 9    and 25 days of community service in a program benefiting 10    children shall be imposed in addition to any other 11    criminal or administrative sanction.12        (I) A violation of subparagraph (K) of paragraph (1) 13    of this subsection (d), is a Class 2 felony and a mandatory 14    fine of $2,500, and 25 days of community service in a 15    program benefiting children shall be imposed in addition 16    to any other criminal or administrative sanction. If the 17    child being transported suffered bodily harm, but not 18    great bodily harm, in a motor vehicle crash, and the 19    violation was the proximate cause of that injury, a 20    mandatory fine of $5,000 and 25 days of community service 21    in a program benefiting children shall be imposed in 22    addition to any other criminal or administrative sanction.23        (J) A violation of subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1) 24    of this subsection (d) is a Class 3 felony, for which a 25    sentence of probation or conditional discharge may not be 26    imposed.   HB1854- 11 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1        (3) Any person sentenced under this subsection (d) who 2    receives a term of probation or conditional discharge must 3    serve a minimum term of either 480 hours of community 4    service or 10 days of imprisonment as a condition of the 5    probation or conditional discharge in addition to any 6    other criminal or administrative sanction.7    (e) Any reference to a prior violation of subsection (a) 8or a similar provision includes any violation of a provision 9of a local ordinance or a provision of a law of another state 10or an offense committed on a military installation that is 11similar to a violation of subsection (a) of this Section.12    (f) The imposition of a mandatory term of imprisonment or 13assignment of community service for a violation of this 14Section shall not be suspended or reduced by the court.15    (g) Any penalty imposed for driving with a license that 16has been revoked for a previous violation of subsection (a) of 17this Section shall be in addition to the penalty imposed for 18any subsequent violation of subsection (a).19    (h) For any prosecution under this Section, a certified 20copy of the driving abstract of the defendant shall be 21admitted as proof of any prior conviction. 22(Source: P.A. 101-363, eff. 8-9-19; 102-982, eff. 7-1-23.) 23    Section 10. The Illinois Marriage and Dissolution of 24Marriage Act is amended by adding Section 520 as follows:   HB1854- 12 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    (750 ILCS 5/520 new)2    Sec. 520. Mandatory child support for victim of aggravated 3driving under the influence.4    (a) If a defendant is found guilty of aggravated driving 5under the influence of alcohol, other drug or drugs, or 6intoxicating compound or compounds, or any combination thereof 7under subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subsection (d) of 8Section 11-501 of the Illinois Vehicle Code where the 9violation has resulted in the death of another, the court 10shall order the defendant to pay an amount reasonable and 11necessary for support of any child of the victim.12    (b) The court shall determine an amount to be paid monthly 13for the child support of a child until the child reaches the 14age of 18 or has graduated from high school, whichever is 15later. The court shall determine an amount for child support 16that is reasonable and necessary to support the child, 17considering all of the relevant factors, including:18        (1) the financial needs and resources of the child;19        (2) the financial needs and resources of the surviving 20    parent or guardian or other current guardian of the child 21    or, if applicable, the financial resources of the State if 22    the Department of Children and Family Services has been 23    appointed as temporary or permanent guardian of the child;24        (3) the standard of living to which the child is 25    accustomed;26        (4) the physical and emotional condition of the child   HB1854- 13 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1    and the child's educational needs;2        (5) the child's physical and legal custody 3    arrangements;4        (6) the reasonable work-related child care expenses of 5    the surviving parent or guardian or other current 6    guardian, if applicable; and7        (7) the financial resources of the defendant.8    (c) The child support order must require that payments be:9        (1) made directly to the person or the agency that 10    will accept and forward payments to the surviving parent 11    or guardian or other current guardian;12        (2) made directly to the surviving parent or guardian 13    or other current guardian; or14        (3) delivered to a community supervision and 15    corrections department for transfer to the surviving 16    parent or guardian or other current guardian.17    (d) If a defendant ordered to pay child support under this 18Section is unable to make the required payments because the 19defendant is confined or imprisoned in a correctional 20facility, the defendant shall begin payments not later than 21the first anniversary of the date of the defendant's release 22from the facility. The defendant may enter into a payment plan 23to address any arrearage that exists on the date of the 24defendant's release. The defendant must pay all arrearages 25regardless of whether the payments were scheduled to terminate 26while the defendant was confined or imprisoned in the   HB1854- 14 -LRB104 09240 LNS 19297 b1correctional facility.2    (e) A child support order issued under this Section may be 3enforced by the Office of the Attorney General, or by a person 4or a parent or guardian of the person named in the order to 5receive the child support, in the same manner as a judgment in 6a civil action.7    (f) As used in this Section, "child" includes any child 8under the age of 18 and any child who is still attending high 9school.